District of Columbia statutes.
34-1505

Licensing requirements.

(a)

All electricity suppliers must obtain a license issued by the Commission in order to do business in the District of Columbia.

(b)

An application for an electricity supplier license shall:

(1)

Be made to the Commission in writing on a form adopted by the Commission;

(2)

Be verified by oath or affirmation;

(3)

Be accompanied by an application fee determined by the Commission; and

(4)

Contain the following:

(A)

Proof of technical and managerial competence;

(B)

Proof of compliance with all applicable requirements of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission and any independent system operator or regional or system transmission operator to be used by the applicant;

(C)

Proof of compliance with all applicable federal and District of Columbia environmental laws;

(D)

Proof of financial integrity;

(E)

Proof that the applicant has registered with the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs to do business in the District of Columbia;

(F)

An agreement or promise to be subject to all applicable taxes;

(G)

An agreement or promise to comply with all of the requirements of this chapter and all orders and regulations of the Commission issued under this chapter; and

(H)

Any other information required by the Commission.

(c)

The Commission shall:

(1)

Require an applicant to post a bond or other similar instrument if, in the Commission’s judgment, the bond or similar instrument is necessary to insure an applicant’s financial integrity;

(2)

Establish the duration of a license issued under this section, procedures and requirements for license renewal, and provisions regarding the surrender and lapse of a license; and

(3)

Establish any other requirements for an applicant that the Commission determines to be in the public interest.

(d)

A license may not be transferred without the prior approval of the Commission.

(e)

All monies collected by the Commission under this section shall be used exclusively for the daily operations of the Commission.

(f)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a consolidator may be required by the Commission to file a statement of intent to serve as a consolidator and to provide to the Commission such other information as reasonably may be related to the requirements of the Commission for monitoring the activities of consolidators.

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 105, 47 DCR 1091
This section is referenced in § 34-1504 and § 34-1513.